Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.554

Limitation on new issues.

(1) Issues not raised before the agency may not be raised on appeal, except to the extent that:

(a) The person did not know and was under no duty to discover or could not have reasonably discovered facts giving rise to the issue;

(b) The agency action subject to judicial review is a rule and the person has not been a party in adjudicative proceedings that provided an adequate opportunity to raise the issue;

(c) The agency action subject to judicial review is an order and the person was not notified of the adjudicative proceeding in substantial compliance with this chapter; or

(d) The interests of justice would be served by resolution of an issue arising from:

(i) A change in controlling law occurring after the agency action; or

(ii) Agency action occurring after the person exhausted the last feasible opportunity for seeking relief from the agency.

(2) The court shall remand to the agency for determination any issue that is properly raised pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

[ 1988 c 288 s 512.]